Hawaii statutes.
[§514B-112] Condominium community mutual obligations. (a) All unit owners, tenants of owners,
employees of owners and tenants, or any other persons that may in any manner
use property or any part thereof submitted to this chapter are subject to this
chapter and to the declaration and bylaws of the association adopted pursuant
to this chapter.

(b) All
agreements, decisions, and determinations lawfully made by the association in
accordance with the voting percentages established in this chapter, the declaration,
or the bylaws are binding on all unit owners.

(c) Each
unit owner, tenants and employees of an owner, and other persons using the
property shall comply strictly with the covenants, conditions, and restrictions
set forth in the declaration, the bylaws, and the house rules adopted pursuant
thereto. Failure to comply with any of the same shall be grounds for an action
to recover sums due, for damages or injunctive relief, or both, maintainable by
the managing agent, resident manager, or board on behalf of the association or,
in a proper case, by an aggrieved unit owner. [L
2004, c 164, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next